Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-620
License; certificates; fees.

No license, renewal of license, branch office certificate, or solicitor's certificate, as provided for in the Collection Agency Act, shall be issued by the board until the following fees have been paid to the Secretary of State: For a license, not to exceed two hundred dollars; for renewal of a license, not to exceed one hundred dollars; for a branch office certificate, not to exceed fifty dollars; for renewal of a branch office certificate, not to exceed thirty-five dollars; for a solicitor's certificate and for renewal of a solicitor's certificate, not to exceed ten dollars. The amount of the fees shall be fixed by the board and shall not exceed the amounts actually necessary to sustain the administration and enforcement of the act.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 24, p. 1603;

Laws 1974, LB 639, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,181;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 20;

Laws 1989, LB 206, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 18.